Utah statutes.
73-1-1.   Waters declared property of public.
(1)  All waters in this state, whether above or under the ground are hereby
declared to be the property of the public, subject to all existing rights to
the use thereof.
(2)  The declaration of public ownership of water in Subsection (1) does not
create or recognize an easement for public recreational use on private
property.
(3)  The Legislature shall govern the use of public water for beneficial
purposes, as limited by constitutional protections for private property.
(4)  The right of the public to use public water for recreational purposes is
governed by Chapter 29, Public Waters Access Act.
